District of Columbia statutes.
7-1306.05

Effective date.

This chapter shall take effect pursuant to the provisions of § 1-206.02(c)(1). With respect to persons who are residents in facilities on the effective date of this chapter, the provisions of the chapter will take effect immediately, with the exception of the admission and commitment hearing procedures established in subchapters III and IV of this chapter. The Court shall begin hearings under subchapters III and IV of this chapter to review the commitment of such persons, and shall appoint appropriate officers to review the admission of such persons, as soon as possible, but not later than 180 days after the effective date of this chapter. All Court hearings to review the admission or commitment of persons residing in facilities on the effective date of this chapter shall be completed within 3 years of the effective date of this chapter.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-137, § 696, 25 DCR 5094
1973 Ed. § 6-1699.
1981 Ed., § 6-1985.